src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.xfst.yaml
  Noun -ednamdille: # NOADE
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamdille
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamdile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamdiláma
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamdilev
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamdilen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamdilláj
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamdiles
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamdilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamdile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamdilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamdilijt
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamdilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamdilijda
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamdilijs
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamdilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamdillen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamdilásj
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednam-dille
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednam-dile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednam-diláma
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednam-dilev
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednam-dilen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednam-dilláj
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednam-diles
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednam-dilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednam-dile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednam-dilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednam-dilijt
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednam-dilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednam-dilijda
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednam-dilijs
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednam-dilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednam-dillen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednam-dilásj

  Noun - ednamadille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom:             ednamadille
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen:             ednamadile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:       ednamadiláma
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc:             ednamadilev
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine:             ednamadilen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill:             ednamadilláj
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela:             ednamadiles
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com:             ednamadilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom:             ednamadile
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen:             ednamadilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc:             ednamadilijt
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine:             ednamadilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill:             ednamadilijda
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela:             ednamadilijs
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com:             ednamadilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Ess:                ednamadillen
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamadilásj
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom:             [ednama-dille]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen:             [ednama-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:       [ednama-diláma]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc:             [ednama-dilev]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine:             [ednama-dilen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill:             [ednama-dilláj]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela:             [ednama-diles]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com:             [ednama-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom:             [ednama-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen:             [ednama-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc:             [ednama-dilijt]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine:             [ednama-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill:             [ednama-dilijda]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela:             [ednama-dilijs]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com:             [ednama-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Ess:                [ednama-dillen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ednama-dilásj]

  Noun - ednamijdille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamijdille
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamijdile
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamijdiláma
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamijdilev 
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamijdilen 
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamijdilláj
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamijdiles 
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamijdilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamijdile
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamijdilij 
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamijdilijt
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamijdilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamijdilijda
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamijdilijs
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamijdilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamijdillen
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamijdilásj
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamij-dille
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamij-dile
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamij-diláma
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamij-dilev
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamij-dilen
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamij-dilláj
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamij-diles
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamij-dilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamij-dile
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamij-dilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamij-dilijt
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamij-dilijn
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamij-dilijda
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamij-dilijs
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamij-dilij
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamij-dillen
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamij-dilásj

  Noun - ulmusjjuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmusjjuolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmusjjuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmusjjuolgedak, ulmusjjuolgeda]
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj-juolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmusj-juolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmusj-juolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj-juolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj-juolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmusj-juolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmusj-juolgedak, ulmusj-juolgeda]

  Noun - ulmustjajuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutjajuolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjajuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmutjajuolgedak, ulmutjajuolgeda]
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutja-juolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutja-juolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutja-juolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutja-juolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutja-juolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutja-juolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmutja-juolgedak, ulmutja-juolgeda]

  Noun - ulmutjijjuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutjijjuolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjijjuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmutjijjuolgedak, ulmutjijjuolgeda]
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjij-juolgge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutjij-juolge
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjij-juolggáj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjij-juolgásj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjij-juolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutjij-juolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: [ulmutjij-juolgedak, ulmutjij-juolgeda]

  Noun - dilletjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dilletjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: dilletjåhkanimen 
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dilletjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dilletjåhkanimásj
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dille-tjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: dille-tjåhkanimen
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dille-tjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dille-tjåhkanimásj

  Noun - diletjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: diletjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: diletjåhkanimen
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: diletjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dile-tjåhkanibme
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: dile-tjåhkanimen
    dille+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dile-tjåhkanibmáj
